Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 3
ORGANIZATION - OPERATION

2-2-301. Call of houses to order.

At the time established as provided in section 2-2-303.5 for the meeting of the first regular session of the general assembly next after the general election, the holdover senators and senators-elect shall meet in the hall of the senate, and the members-elect of the house of representatives shall meet in the hall of the house of representatives. The president of the next preceding session of the senate, or in case of the president's absence the holdover senator or one of them having served the longest continuous time in the senate, shall call the senate to order. The speaker of the next preceding session of the house of representatives, or in the speaker's absence the person holding a certificate issued by the secretary of state as a member and having served the longest continuous time in the house of representatives, shall call the house of representatives to order.

Source:

R.S.

p. 419, § 1.

G.L.

§ 1290.

L. 1883:

p. 201, § 1.

G.S.

§ 1575.

L. 1893:

p. 282, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2895.

C.L.

§ 2.

CSA:

C. 74, § 2.

L. 51:

p. 438, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-1.

L. 65:

p. 683, § 1.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 296, § 7, effective May 20.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 579, § 1, effective April 7.

Cross references:

For when the general assembly meets, see § 7 of art. V, Colo. Const.; for the oath of office of members of the general assembly, see § 2 of art. V, Colo. Const.

2-2-302. Clerks to file certificates - roll - officers.

The clerk of each house shall file the certificates presented by the members, each for his own house, and make a roll of the members who thus appear to be elected, and the persons thus appearing to be elected members shall proceed to elect such other officers as may be required for the time being.

Source:

G.L.

§ 1291.

G.S.

§ 1576.

R.S. 08:

§ 2896.

C.L.

§ 3.

CSA:

C. 74, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-2.

2-2-303. Committee on credentials - permanent organization.

When the houses are temporarily organized, the presiding officer in each house, with the consent of said house, shall appoint a committee of three members thereof to report upon the credentials of those claiming to be elected members of their respective houses. When the report is made, those reported as elected shall proceed to the permanent organization of their respective houses; except that a committee on credentials may recommend that a person be seated as a member of the general assembly pursuant to subsection (2) of this section pending the outcome of an election contest or special legislative election called pursuant to section 1-11-303, C.R.S. Each house will be the sole judge of the election returns and qualifications of its own members.

In the event that the election of any person as a member of the state senate or the state house of representatives at any general election held in November, 2000, or thereafter is contested pursuant to section 1-11-208, C.R.S., a committee on credentials may recommend to the state senate or the state house of representatives that the person who is certified by the secretary of state as the member elected in such state senate or state house of representatives district be seated or may recommend to the state senate or the state house of representatives that a contestor or contestee in such contest who was a candidate in such election and who is not certified by the secretary of state be seated pending the outcome of the election contest or a special legislative election called pursuant to section 1-11-303, C.R.S., if:

An accurate and verifiable vote count showing the person having the highest number of votes cast in the district for the contested state senate or the state house of representatives seat cannot be obtained from the election returns; and

The inability to obtain an accurate and verifiable vote count may have directly affected the outcome of the election.

Any person that a credentials committee recommends be seated pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall have all the rights, powers, and duties of a duly elected member of the general assembly pending the outcome of an election contest or a special legislative election called pursuant to section 1-11-303, C.R.S.

A committee on credentials that makes a recommendation pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may, in such committee's report under subsection (1) of this section, make recommendations to the house in which the contest was initiated on matters arising from such contest, including, but not limited to:

That the election contest be resolved by the committee on credentials of such house;

That such house call a special legislative election pursuant to section 1-11-303, C.R.S.;

That the election contest be referred to a committee of reference in such house to make recommendations on the resolution of the contest or for the purpose of determining whether a special legislative election should be called pursuant to section 1-11-303, C.R.S.

Source:

G.L.

§ 1292.

G.S.

§ 1577.

R.S. 08:

§ 2897.

C.L.

§ 4.

CSA:

C. 74, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-3.

L. 65:

p. 684, § 2.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 1383, § 1, effective June 4.

Cross references:

For each house choosing its officers, see § 10 of art. V, Colo. Const.

2-2-303.5. Time for convening regular sessions - procedure for convening earlier.

The provisions of this section are enacted in furtherance of section 7 of article V of the state constitution, which provides that the general assembly shall meet in regular session at 10 a.m. no later than the second Wednesday of January of each year.

Unless a different date is established in accordance with subsection (3) or (4) of this section, the general assembly shall meet in regular session at 10 a.m. on the second Wednesday of January of each year.

The general assembly, acting by joint resolution, may designate the date of convening the next regular session of the general assembly. Any date designated pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be a date on or after January 1 but prior to the date specified in subsection (2) of this section.

In the event the general assembly does not act during the regular session pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the executive committee of the legislative council, after the regular session but no later than November 1, may designate the date of convening the next regular session of the general assembly. Any date designated pursuant to this subsection (4) shall be a date on or after January 1 but prior to the date specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 579, § 2, effective April 7.

2-2-304. Members not to be questioned.

No members of the general assembly will be questioned in any other place for any speech or word spoken in debate in either house or for conducting or performing any other legislative activity that relates to the drafting of bills and other legislative measures, including amendments to such bills or measures, and to the rendering of assistance or information to constituents on their personal and private matters that are not publicly known. In addition, no staff members of the general assembly will be questioned in any other place for conducting or performing any duties or functions directly related to such legislative activity when it is conducted or performed at the direction of members of the general assembly.

Source:

G.L.

§ 1293.

G.S.

§ 1578.

R.S. 08:

§ 2898.

C.L.

§ 5.

CSA:

C. 74, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-4.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1348), ch. 358, p. 1863, § 1, effective June 1.

2-2-305. Legislative employees - compensation.

The officers and employees of each house of the general assembly of the state of Colorado and their compensation shall be determined by joint resolution of both houses, and such officers and employees shall be appointed without regard to the state personnel system.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 254, § 1.

C.L.

§ 6.

CSA:

C. 74, § 6.

L. 45:

p. 366, § 1.

L. 47:

p. 479, § 1.

L. 51:

p. 439, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-5.

Cross references:

For compensation of officers and employees, see § 27 of art. V, Colo. Const.

2-2-306. Appointment - qualifications - duties.

All such officers and employees, except as otherwise provided in this part 3, shall be selected by the house employing them, and they shall perform the duties usually performed by like officers and employees, and all other duties as may be required of them by the house employing them. All clerks provided for in this part 3 shall be assignable and all printing clerks shall be skilled and competent proofreaders.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 256, § 2.

C.L.

§ 7.

CSA:

C. 74, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-6.

2-2-307. Compensation of members - reimbursement of expenses.

Repealed.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b)(II) of this section, commencing on the first day of the legislative session beginning in January of 2019, and the first day of each legislative session beginning in January each two years thereafter, all members of the general assembly whose terms commence on such day and members appointed to fill vacancies for unexpired terms of those members shall receive as an annual base compensation for their services an amount equal to twenty-five percent of the total annual salary paid as of such day to the judges of the county court in Class B counties, as defined in section 13-6-201. The base compensation shall be payable in twelve equal monthly amounts. The director of research of the legislative council appointed pursuant to section 2-3-304 (1) shall post the amount of the current annual base compensation payable to a member of the general assembly pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) on the website of the general assembly.

For the period commencing on the first day of the legislative session beginning in January of 2021, and ending on the day before the first day of the legislative session beginning in January of 2022, all members of the general assembly whose terms commence on the first day of the legislative session beginning in January of 2021 shall receive as an annual base compensation for their services forty thousand two hundred forty-two dollars, which is the same amount as the annual base compensation for their services for members of the general assembly whose terms commenced on the first day of the legislative session beginning in January of 2019.

(1.5) Repealed.

The compensation for the services of the members of the general assembly shall be adjusted as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(e) of this section, if any member of the general assembly is absent for any purpose from two-thirds or more of the sessions of the member's respective house, two-thirds of the compensation allowed under this section is forfeited.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(e) of this section, if any member of the general assembly is absent for any purpose from one-third or more, but less than two-thirds, of the sessions of the member's respective house, one-third of the compensation allowed under this section is forfeited.

The presiding officer of each house shall certify the number of days for which each member of each respective house shall be compensated and the amount due each member or owing from each member within ten days after adjournment sine die. Such certification shall be submitted to the state controller.

For purposes of this subsection (2), "session" means any regular meeting of either house of the general assembly in its respective chamber to consider the passage of legislation and any meeting of all committees of either house. No other meetings shall be considered sessions.

The president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives may approve a member of their respective house for an absence for purposes of a long-term illness, parental leave in excess of the maximum period set forth in subsection (2)(e)(II) of this section, or another similar purpose, and a member receiving such approval shall not be required to forfeit compensation as set forth in subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b) of this section.

Any member of the general assembly may be absent for purposes of parental leave for a maximum of twelve weeks, plus up to an additional four weeks for a serious health condition related to pregnancy complications or childbirth complications, during session and shall not forfeit compensation as set forth in subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b) of this section. However, nothing in this subsection (2)(e)(II) exempts a member of the general assembly from receiving any approval required by subsection (2)(e)(I) of this section or legislative rules for any period of absence for purposes of parental leave that is longer than the duration specified in this subsection (2)(e)(II).

The president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the senate and house majority and minority leaders for attendance to matters pertaining to the general assembly, whether such matters are at the capitol or elsewhere. In addition, the persons who have been chosen after a general election to serve as president, speaker, and majority and minority leaders for the next legislative biennium shall be entitled to the same compensation as is provided for current leaders under this subparagraph (III), so long as such new leaders are members of the current general assembly.

Except as provided in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (IV), any member of a committee of reference designated pursuant to section 2-3-1201 who attends a meeting of the committee of reference or who attends a meeting of the joint budget committee when it is considering matters for which the member's committee of reference has oversight responsibility, or, with the approval of the chairperson, who attends a state function or a function at a state institution or state agency at which matters concerning the committee are considered. The executive committee of the legislative council may establish guidelines for the payment of per diem to members of a committee of reference who attend meetings of the joint budget committee as allowed by this subparagraph (IV).

If a member of the current general assembly is appointed when the general assembly is in recess for more than three days or is not in session to serve on a committee of reference for the next regular session of the general assembly, such member shall thereafter only be entitled to compensation pursuant to this subparagraph (IV) as a member of a committee of reference upon which the member has been appointed to serve during the next regular session of the general assembly and shall not be entitled to compensation pursuant to this subparagraph (IV) as a member of a committee of reference upon which the member served during the most recently completed regular session of the general assembly but upon which the member is not appointed to serve during the next regular session of the general assembly.

For purposes of this subparagraph (IV), "member" includes an appointee to a committee of reference designated by the appointing authority as provided by the applicable rules of the house of representatives and senate respectively prior to the convening of the general assembly at which such member is to serve, whether such appointee is a member of the then current general assembly or member-elect of the next general assembly, or both.

With the prior approval of the executive committee of the legislative council, any member of a committee of reference who attends a meeting of the committee of reference when it is considering matters for which the committee of reference has oversight responsibility.

When the general assembly is in recess for more than three days or is not in session, in addition to the base compensation specified in subsection (1) of this section, the following members of the general assembly shall be entitled to the further sum of ninety-nine dollars per day for necessary attendance at meetings or functions or to legislative matters as follows:

(I) Any member who attends a meeting of the legislative council, committees established by the legislative council, interim committees authorized by law or by joint resolution of the two houses, or the committee on legal services;

(I.5) The chair of an interim committee authorized by law or by joint resolution, or the chair's designee, who attends a meeting of the legislative council, or the executive committee of the legislative council, at the request of the legislative council or the executive committee;

(II) Any member of the joint budget committee or the legislative audit committee who attends a meeting of the joint budget committee or legislative audit committee, or, with the approval of the chairperson, who attends a state function or a function at a state institution or state agency at which matters concerning the joint budget committee or the legislative audit committee are considered;

Any member of the general assembly who is entitled to compensation pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall also be entitled to reimbursement for all actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses to be paid after such expenses are incurred. Mileage rates shall not exceed those authorized for the executive department.

The requirements of subsections (2) and (4) of this section are applicable to all claims for compensation and reimbursement under this section.

Prior to incurring any expenses for which reimbursement may be claimed, other than those incurred under subsection (3) of this section, a member of the house of representatives shall obtain the approval of the speaker of the house of representatives and a senator shall obtain the approval of the majority leader of the senate. Vouchers for the payment of such expenses of members of the house of representatives shall be approved by the speaker of the house of representatives, and vouchers for the payment of such expenses of senators shall be approved by the majority leader of the senate.

The director of research of the legislative council shall approve payroll vouchers and vouchers for per diem payments incurred in connection with attendance by members of both houses at meetings of the statutory committees listed under article 3 of this title, a committee of any such agency, any interim committee authorized by law, by joint resolution, or by resolution of either house, or any committee of reference described in subparagraph (V) of paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section.

Prior approval of expenses incurred by members of any legislative committee created by law in connection with the activities of any national or regional organization in which Colorado officially participates shall be obtained from the chairperson of the appropriate committee.

Members of the general assembly shall be entitled to reimbursement for all actual and necessary travel expenses incurred for vehicle travel while attending to legislative business, which expenses are not otherwise paid or reimbursed under any other provision of this part 3. Mileage rates shall not exceed those authorized for the executive department.

With the approval of the executive committee of the legislative council, members of the general assembly shall be entitled to reimbursement for all actual and necessary expenses incurred due to extraordinary or unforeseen circumstances related to the legislative business of the member.

The executive committee of the legislative council may establish guidelines regarding reimbursements and substantiation requirements for actual and necessary travel expenses incurred by members of the general assembly.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 293, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-7.

L. 55:

p. 423, § 1.

L. 58:

p. 237, § 3.

L. 62:

pp. 168, 169, §§ 1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-7.

L. 64:

p. 476, § 1.

L. 65:

p. 684, § 3.

L. 67:

p. 600, §§ 1, 2.

L. 69:

p. 459, § 1.

L. 70:

p. 190, § 2.

L. 73:

p. 668, §§ 1, 2.

L. 75:

(5)(b) and (5)(c) amended, p. 196, § 1, effective June 20.

L. 76:

(1) and (2) repealed, p. 593, § 5, effective July 1; (6) amended and (8) to (11) added, p. 589, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(12) added, p. 578, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(9)(a) to (9)(c) amended, p. 327, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 82:

IP(9) amended, p. 618, § 2, effective April 2.

L. 84:

(9)(a) to (9)(c) and IP(12)(a) amended and (13) added, p. 280, § 1, effective May 9.

L. 89:

(4) to (6), (8), and (12) repealed and (9) amended, pp. 331, 330, §§ 3, 1, effective June 10.

L. 93:

Entire section R&RE, p. 566, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 96:

(3)(a) amended, p. 791, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 1176, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 98:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 815, §§ 3, 4, effective August 5.

L. 99:

(3)(a)(IV) amended, p. 1437, § 1, effective March 15; (3)(a)(III) amended, p. 408, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(3)(a)(I.5) added, p. 2049, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 2001:

(3)(a)(IV) amended, p. 1102, § 1, effective August 15.

L. 2006:

(5) amended, p. 1348, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2007:

(3)(a)(V) added and (4)(b) and (5) amended, pp. 1314, 1315, §§ 2, 3, 4, effective May 25.

L. 2010:

(5)(c) added, (SB 10-119), ch. 103, p. 348, § 1, effective April 15.

L. 2015:

(1) amended, (SB 15-288), ch. 270, p. 1059, § 2, effective January 1, 2016.

L. 2016:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 754, § 7, effective June 6.

L. 2020:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 20-1423), ch. 233, p. 1128, § 1, effective July 2.

L. 2022:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended and (2)(e) added, (SB 22-184), ch. 486, p. 3529, § 1, effective August 10.

2-2-308. Officers and employees - cessation of pay - when - exceptions.

The compensation of officers and employees of each house of the general assembly shall cease upon final adjournment of each session, but prior to final adjournment of a session, each house may designate by resolution such officers and employees as are necessary to complete the clerical work and records of the proceedings of such session and fix their terms of service. Also, prior to adjournment of a session to a day certain, the general assembly may terminate by joint resolution the compensation of its officers and employees during such period of adjournment, but each house may designate by resolution such officers and employees as are necessary to complete, to the extent possible during such period of adjournment, the clerical work and records of the proceedings of such session and fix their terms of service.

The presiding officer of either house is hereby authorized to recall such officers or employees of his house as may be required to render clerical or other services to committees of his house or joint committees of both houses meeting between sessions of the general assembly.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 257, § 4.

C.L.

§ 9.

CSA:

C. 74, § 9.

L. 53:

p. 332, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-8.

L. 55:

p. 423, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-8.

2-2-309. Method of payment.

The presiding officer of each house shall certify at such times as may be necessary during each session and thereafter the number of days of service rendered by each officer and employee of his respective house and the amount payable for such service, and the state controller, upon receipt of such certification, shall issue vouchers and draw warrants for the compensation due each officer and employee, without certification from the state personnel director, and the state treasurer shall pay the same out of the moneys appropriated for the purpose.

Upon receipt of the certification required by section 2-2-307 (2)(c), the controller shall issue vouchers and draw warrants for the compensation due each member. Such compensation shall be adjusted in accordance with the provisions of section 2-2-307 (2) and (4). In the event such certification evidences an overpayment to a member for compensation during the session, the controller shall cause a statement of deficiency to be issued for the recovery of such funds previously disbursed to the member. Any such statement of deficiency shall be enforceable as a debt to the state of Colorado and may be enforced in the appropriate court by the attorney general.

The controller, upon taking official notice of the existing membership of the general assembly, shall issue vouchers and draw warrants for the monthly and semimonthly per diem compensation and for the reimbursement of expenses and travel authorized by section 2-2-307.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 257, § 5.

C.L.

§ 10.

CSA:

C. 74, § 10.

L. 53:

p. 332, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-9.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 303, § 1, effective March 18.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 568, § 2, effective April 30.

2-2-310. Senate and house journals published.

The speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate shall have copies of each of the journals of their respective houses published as soon as practicable after the adjournment of each session of the general assembly. The journals covering regular sessions and special sessions may be combined in a single volume for this purpose. The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate shall, as soon as possible after adjournment of any session of the general assembly, deliver to the state archives the original journals of their respective houses. They shall also deliver to the printer a complete and accurate copy of the same, indexed and ready for printing, and also a brief index of all bills, resolutions, and memorials introduced in each of their respective houses during the session. The speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate shall certify the correctness of the published copies of said journals, which certificates shall be included in and made a part of such publications. Said journals, when printed and certified, together with all former printed volumes of house and senate journals of preceding sessions of general assemblies of the state of Colorado, published by authority of the state of Colorado, shall be taken and held as prima facie evidence of the originals thereof.

Source:

L. 1899:

p. 240, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2907.

C.L.

§ 14.

CSA:

C. 74, § 14.

L. 53:

p. 333, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-11.

L. 63:

p. 274, § 12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-11.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 38, § 1, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For bills being presented to the governor, see § 11 of art. IV, Colo. Const.; for reading and passage of bills, see § 22 of art. V, Colo. Const.; for the general provisions relating to and specifications for printing journals, see §§ 24-70-201 to 24-70-222.

2-2-311. Disposition of journals.

The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall deliver one copy of each of the published journals to the supreme court library and twenty-two copies to the Colorado state library for delivery to twenty designated Colorado state documents depositories; except that, if the state library supplies microfiche copies of the published journals to the state documents depositories, only four copies of the published journals shall be delivered.

The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall send a joint written notice to each county clerk and recorder in the state that the published journals are available. If the county clerk and recorder of any county wishes to receive one copy of each of the published journals, he shall so notify the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives, and a copy of each shall be delivered to him. If any county law library in the state requests a copy of each of the published journals from the secretary of the senate and chief clerk of the house of representatives, said copies shall be delivered to such library.

The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall retain sufficient copies of the published journals for other official uses and for those legislators who request them.

The notification and response required in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be in a timely manner such that compliance with the legislative printing contract for senate and house journals can be met.

Source:

L. 1899:

p. 242, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 2908.

C.L.

§ 15.

CSA:

C. 74, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-12.

L. 63:

p. 275, § 13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-12.

L. 71:

p. 627, § 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 329, § 1, effective March 20.

2-2-312. Cost of publication.

The cost of the publication of said journals shall be paid out of any moneys available and appropriated for the payment of the incidental and contingent expenses of the general assembly.

Source:

L. 1899:

p. 242, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 2909.

C.L.

§ 16.

CSA:

C. 74, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-13.

L. 71:

p. 627, § 2.

2-2-313. Witnesses - attendance before assembly.

The general assembly, or either house thereof, by resolution or otherwise, as it deems best, may prescribe the conditions under which and the manner in which a witness may be summoned to attend, with or without documents in his possession or under his control, before any committee of said general assembly or of either house thereof.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 637, § 1.

C.L.

§ 17.

CSA:

C. 74, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-14.

Cross references:

For the authority of legislative council to compel attendance of witnesses and procedure therefor, see § 2-3-306; for the authority of the legislative audit committee to subpoena witnesses, see § 2-3-107; for fees and expenses of witnesses in civil cases, see §§ 13-33-102 and 13-33-103; for intimidation of legislative witnesses, see § 8-2.5-101.

2-2-314. Violation - penalty.

Any person who fails or refuses to obey any such summons so issued commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 637, § 2.

C.L.

§ 18.

CSA:

C. 74, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-15.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3132, § 50, effective March 1, 2022.

2-2-315. Member may administer oath.

The chairman of any committee appointed by either house of the general assembly of this state or any chairman of any joint committee appointed by the two houses of the general assembly is authorized to administer oaths and affirmations to witnesses, touching any matter or thing which may be under the consideration or investigation of the committee.

Source:

R.S.

p. 482, § 4.

G.L.

§ 1928.

G.S.

§ 2474.

R.S. 08:

§ 4672.

C.L.

§ 19.

CSA:

C. 74, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-16.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1557, § 10, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the form of oath, see § 24-12-101.

2-2-316. Legislative declaration - travel by members - during adjournment.

Considering the greatly improved highways and airways of this state which permit greater mobility with less cost in money and time, considering the increasing length of legislative sessions, the increasing complexity and importance of the problems presented, and the benefits to be derived from frequent contact between legislator and constituents, and considering the desirability of preserving the concept of part-time citizen-legislators and, therefore, the need to allow them a reasonable opportunity to attend to their own personal, family, and business affairs even during sessions of the general assembly, it is hereby declared to be necessary, within the meaning of the state constitution and in the best interests of the general assembly and the state of Colorado, that members of the senate and house of representatives travel to their homes or other locations within their districts and back to the capitol during sessions of the general assembly when the house to which they belong is in adjournment for periods not exceeding seventy-two hours.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 955, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-28.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 198, § 1, effective February 28.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 2322, § 3, effective February 7.

2-2-317. Expense, subsistence, and travel allowance - definition.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), each member of the general assembly shall be entitled to receive up to forty-five dollars per legislative day for expenses incurred during the sessions of the general assembly. Such allowance shall be considered as salary pursuant to section 24-51-101 (42), C.R.S. Each member of the general assembly who is serving on July 1, 1997, and who is entitled to such allowance may elect to have all of such allowance that was paid to the member during the period from January 1, 1992, through May 31, 1994, be considered salary pursuant to section 24-51-101 (42), C.R.S., subject to the following conditions:

Payment shall be received by the public employees' retirement association of the amount of member contributions from the member and employer contributions from the employer on the allowance that was paid during the period, with appropriate interest calculated by the association;

The election shall be made no later than December 31, 1997; and

Payment of the total amount required, through a lump sum or through installments, shall be received by the public employees' retirement association on or before December 31, 1998.

Repealed.

In lieu of the expenses allowed in subsection (1)(a) of this section, if a member does not reside in the Denver metropolitan area, which area shall be designated in guidelines established by the executive committee of legislative council, the member shall be entitled to receive per legislative day for expenses incurred during the sessions of the general assembly up to an amount equal to the following:

For fiscal years commencing prior to July 1, 2020, and on or after July 1, 2021, eighty-five percent of the federal per diem rate for the city and county of Denver, rounded up to the nearest whole dollar, as determined by the United States general services administration, or such succeeding entity, as of October 1 of the calendar year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the per diem rate is to be used; and

For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2020, eighty-five percent of the federal per diem rate for the city and county of Denver, rounded up to the nearest whole dollar, as determined by the United States general services administration, or such succeeding entity, as of October 1, 2018.

Repealed.

The per diem lodging and expense allowances of the general assembly as fixed by subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) shall apply to regular or special sessions of the general assembly subsequent to July 1, 2012.

The general assembly may provide by joint resolution for the suspension on a temporary basis of the normal per diem lodging and expense allowance, or any portion thereof, during that period when the general assembly is in recess for more than three days.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a member of the general assembly from declining to accept all or part of the per diem lodging and expense allowance authorized by this subsection (1).

Each member of the general assembly who is entitled to claim a per diem lodging and expense allowance pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section shall also be entitled to receive travel expenses to such member's home and back to the capitol for each legislative day of actual attendance.

Each member of the general assembly who is entitled to claim an expense per diem pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section shall also be entitled to receive travel expenses to any location within such member's district and back to Denver once each week, pursuant to section 2-2-316.

The executive committee of the legislative council may establish guidelines regarding reimbursements and substantiation requirements for actual and necessary travel expenses incurred by members of the general assembly.

For purposes of this section, "legislative day" means any day during the legislative session, including legal holidays, primary election days, and Saturdays and Sundays.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 955, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-29.

L. 69:

p. 460, § 2.

L. 73:

p. 671, § 1.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 198, § 2, effective February 28.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 440, § 1, effective May 2.

L. 81:

(4) added, p. 331, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 85:

(1) to (3) amended and (5) added, p. 274, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 89:

(1) to (3) amended and (5) repealed, p. 331, §§ 2, 3, effective June 10.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 569, § 3, effective April 30.

L. 97:

(1)(a) amended, p. 779, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(b) amended, p. 327, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 2007:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended, p. 1314, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 2008:

(1)(b), (1)(c), and (2)(b) amended, pp. 2321, 2323, §§ 2, 4, effective February 7.

L. 2010:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended and (2)(c) added, (SB 10-119), ch. 103, pp. 348, 349, §§ 2, 3, effective April 15.

L. 2020:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (SB 20-220), ch. 202, p. 1003, § 1, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

Subsections (1)(b)(I)(B) and (1)(c)(I)(B) provided for the repeal of subsections (1)(b)(I) and (1)(c)(I), effective October 1, 2012. (See L. 2010, pp. 348, 349.)

2-2-318. Members to be reimbursed for expenses.

Each member of the general assembly shall be reimbursed for expenses actually incurred pursuant to sections 2-2-316 and 2-2-317. In auditing any mileage claim of members of the general assembly, the controller is authorized to accept without further substantiating evidence the expense voucher duly signed by the member if the mileage in such claim does not exceed the authorized rate at which employees of the executive branch are reimbursed. In addition, he may accept without such further evidence the member's certification as to the number of days of actual attendance under section 2-2-317 (1) or, in lieu thereof, the member's certification as to the number of days of actual occupancy under section 2-2-317 (2).

Source:

L. 67:

p. 955, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-30.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 199, § 3, effective February 28.

Cross references:

For mileage allowance for state officers, see § 24-9-104 and § 6 of article V, Colo. Const.

2-2-319. Sections 2-2-316 to 2-2-319 provide no increase in compensation or mileage.

The general assembly declares that the provisions of sections 2-2-316 to 2-2-319 relate not to compensation but to the necessity of certain traveling expenses and that the purpose is neither to increase compensation nor mileage.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 956, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-31.